Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2024 c 347 s 2; and(2) 2021 c 305 s 5.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2024 c 347 s 13 (uncodified); and(2) 2024 c 347 s 14 (uncodified).Sec. 3. 2021 c 305 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:((Sections 2 and))Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2026.Sec. 4. 2021 c 305 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:((Sections 5 and))Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70C.150 and 2021 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The superior court may transfer the judicial review of a land use decision to the court of appeals upon finding that all parties have consented to the transfer to the court of appeals and agreed that the judicial review can occur based upon an existing record. Transfer of cases pursuant to this section does not require the filing of a motion for discretionary review with the court of appeals.(2) Upon stipulation and consent to transfer, the parties waive the right to seek an award of attorneys' fees and costs under RCW 4.84.370, except as may be awarded following an appeal to the supreme court.(3) RCW 36.70C.090 does not apply to a matter transferred to the court of appeals pursuant to this section.(4) ((This section expires June 30, 2026.))A party's withholding of consent to transfer is inadmissible as evidence at trial, and may not be used against the party withholding consent in any proceeding.--- END ---